District of Columbia statutes.
25-406

Application for a solicitor’s license.

The application for the issuance or renewal of a solicitor’s license shall include:

(1)

The full name and home address of the applicant, if an individual;

(2)

The business name and address of the applicant;

(3)

The name, business address, and business telephone number for the vendor that the applicant represents; and

(4)

Written statements and evidence establishing to the satisfaction of the Board that the applicant meets all of the qualifications set forth in § 25-301.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959